Washington statutes.
RCW 19.28.241

Revocation of certificate of competency—Grounds—Procedure.

(1) The department may revoke any certificate of competency upon the following grounds:

(a) The certificate was obtained through error or fraud;

(b) The holder thereof is judged to be incompetent to work in the electrical construction trade as a journey level electrician or specialty electrician;

(c) The holder thereof has violated any of the provisions of RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 or any rule adopted under this chapter; or

(d) The holder thereof has committed a serious violation of this chapter or any rule adopted under this chapter. A serious violation is a violation that presents imminent danger to the public.

(2) The department may deny an application for a certificate of competency for up to two years if the applicant's previous certificate of competency has been revoked.

(3) Before any certificate of competency shall be revoked, the holder shall be given written notice of the department's intention to do so, mailed by registered mail, return receipt requested, to the holder's last known address. The notice shall enumerate the allegations against the holder, and shall give the holder the opportunity to request a hearing before the board. At the hearing, the department and the holder may produce witnesses and give testimony. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW. The board shall render its decision based upon the testimony and evidence presented, and shall notify the parties immediately upon reaching its decision. A majority of the board shall be necessary to render a decision.

(4) The department shall immediately suspend the license or certificate of a person who has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order. If the person has continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of the license or certificate shall be automatic upon the department's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and health services stating that the licensee is in compliance with the order.

[ 2013 c 23 s 36; 2002 c 249 s 8; 2001 c 211 s 17; 1997 c 58 s 845; 1988 c 81 s 15; 1983 c 206 s 18; 1980 c 30 s 9. Formerly RCW 19.28.580.]

NOTES:

Short title—Part headings, captions, table of contents not law—Exemptions and waivers from federal law—Conflict with federal requirements—Severability—1997 c 58: See RCW 74.08A.900 through 74.08A.904.

Effective dates—Intent—1997 c 58: See notes following RCW 74.20A.320.